apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
<pardef n="val__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vu/k__n"    >
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>če</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovi</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kova</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>kove</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ke</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>kovi</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="zna/k__n"    >
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>će</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ku</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kom</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovi</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kova</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>kove</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ke</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>kovi</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kovima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>kima</l><r>k<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/ijeg__n"    >
    <e><p><l>ijeg</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijega</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijegu</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ijeg</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iježe</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijegu</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ijegom</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>egovi</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijezi</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>egova</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijega</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>egovima</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijezima</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>egove</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijege</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>egovi</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijezi</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>egovima</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijezima</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>egovima</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ijezima</l><r>ijeg<s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="val"><i>val</i><par n="val__n" /></e>
<e lm="vuk"><i>vu</i><par n="vu/k__n" /></e>
<e lm="znak"><i>zna</i><par n="zna/k__n" /></e>
<e lm="brijeg"><i>br</i><par n="br/ijeg__n" /></e>
